Utah statutes.
31A-34-111.   Alliance evaluation.

Each alliance shall make a detailed annual report to the commissioner no later than March 1 containing at least the following:

(1)  the progress achieved in assuring affordable health care coverage to eligible employees of members;

(2)  the benefits, if any, to its members and enrollees of purchasing health insurance through the alliance; and

(3)   changes in the law or procedure that would increase overall efficiency, reduce costs, or improve fairness.



Enacted by Chapter 143, 1996 General Session

